Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5653YC (4) 91 ak/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135S.1 Smoke evacuation system ââ 1 requirements. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âAmbulatory surgical centerâ means an outpatient surgical 5 facility as defined in section 135.61. 6 b. âCritical access hospitalâ means a hospital designated as 7 a critical access hospital pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Â§1395i-4. 8 c. âDepartmentâ means the department of inspections, 9 appeals, and licensing. 10 d. âSmoke evacuation systemâ means smoke evacuators, laser 11 plume evacuators, or local exhaust ventilators that capture and 12 filter surgical smoke at the site of origin before the surgical 13 smoke can make ocular contact or contact with the respiratory 14 tract of a person. 15 e. âSurgical smokeâ means the by-product from the use of 16 energy-generating devices including surgical plume, smoke 17 plume, bioaerosols, laser-generated airborne contaminants, and 18 lung-damaging dust. 19 2. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 20 17A to require the following entities to adopt policies 21 on or before January 1, 2027, to ensure the elimination of 22 surgical smoke through the use of a smoke evacuation system 23 for each procedure that generates surgical smoke through the 24 use of energy-based devices including but not limited to 25 electrosurgical devices and lasers: 26 a. An ambulatory surgical center. 27 b. A hospital as defined in section 135B.1. 28 c. A critical access hospital. 29